Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,132
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Articles of merger or share exchange.

(1) After a plan of merger or share exchange is approved by the shareholders or adopted by the board of directors if shareholder approval is not required, the surviving or acquiring corporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of merger or share exchange setting forth:

(a) The plan of merger or share exchange;

(b) If shareholder approval was not required, a statement to that effect; and

(c) If approval of the shareholders of one or more corporations party to the merger or share exchange was required:

(i) The designation, number of outstanding shares, and number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan as to each corporation; and

(ii) Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan separately by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

(2) A merger or share exchange shall take effect upon the effective date of the articles of merger or share exchange.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 132.